test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-tyonTS_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - тёня: # Noun 'fox / тёня' - full paradigm /MDTN-koodi ya→ə/
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom: тёня
     тёня+N+Sg+Acc: тёнямʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Gen: тёняʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Dat: тёнянʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Loc: тёняхана
     тёня+N+Sg+Abl: тёняхад
     тёня+N+Sg+Pros: тёнявна
     тёня+N+Du+Nom: тёняхаʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Acc: тёняхаʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Gen: тёняхаʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom: тёняˮ
     тёня+N+Pl+Acc: тён
     тёня+N+Pl+Gen: тёнˮ
     тёня+N+Pl+Dat: тёняхаˮ
     тёня+N+Pl+Loc: тёняхаˮна
     тёня+N+Pl+Abl: тёняхат
     тёня+N+Pl+Pros: тёнˮмана
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: тёняв
     тёня+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: тёняв
     тёня+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: тёнян
     тёня+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: тёняхан
     тёня+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: тёняханан
     тёня+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: тёняхадан
     тёня+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: тёнявнан
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: тёняхаюн
     тёня+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: тёняхаюн
     тёня+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: тёняхаюн
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: тёнан
     тёня+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: тёнан
     тёня+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: тёнаˮн
     тёня+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: тёняхаˮн
     тёня+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: тёняхаˮнан
     тёня+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: тёняхатан
     тёня+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: тёнˮманан
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: тёняр
     тёня+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: тёнямд
     тёня+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: тёнянд
     тёня+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: тёняханд
     тёня+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: тёняхананд
     тёня+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: тёняхаданд
     тёня+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: тёнявнанд
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: тёняхаюд
     тёня+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: тёняхаюд
     тёня+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: тёняхают
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: тёнад
     тёня+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: тёнад
     тёня+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: тёнат
     тёня+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: тёняхат
     тёня+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: тёняхаˮнат
     тёня+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: тёняхатат
     тёня+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: тёнˮманат
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: тёняда
     тёня+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: тёнямда
     тёня+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: тёнянда
     тёня+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: тёняханда
     тёня+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: тёняхананда
     тёня+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: тёняхаданда
     тёня+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: тёнявнанда
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: тёняхаюда
     тёня+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: тёняхаюда
     тёня+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: тёняхаюта
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: тёнда
     тёня+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: тёнда
     тёня+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: тёнта
     тёня+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: тёняхата
     тёня+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: тёняхаˮната
     тёня+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [тёняхатата, тёняхатта]
     тёня+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: тёнˮманата
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: тёнямиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: тёнями #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тёня+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: тёнямиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: тёнями #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тёня+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: тёняниʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: тёняни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тёня+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: тёняханиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: тёняхани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тёня+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: тёняхананиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: тёняханани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тёня+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [тёняхаданиʼ, тёняхадниʼ]
     тёня+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [тёняхадани, тёняхадни] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тёня+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: тёнявнаниʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: тёнявнани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: тёняхаюниʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: тёняхаюни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тёня+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: тёняхаюниʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: тёняхаюни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тёня+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: тёняхаюниʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: тёняхаюни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: тённиʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: тённи #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тёня+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: тённиʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: тённи #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тёня+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: тёнˮниʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: тёнˮни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тёня+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: тёняхаˮниʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: тёняхаˮни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тёня+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: тёняхаˮнаниʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: тёняхаˮнани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тёня+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [тёняхатаниʼ, тёняхатниʼ]
     тёня+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [тёняхатани, тёняхатни] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тёня+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: тёнˮмананиʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: тёнˮманани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: тёняриʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: тёнямдиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: тёняндиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: тёняхандиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: тёняханандиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: тёняхадандиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: тёнявнандиʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: тёняхаюдиʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: тёняхаюдиʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: тёняхаютиʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: тёндиʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: тёндиʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: тёнтиʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: тёняхатиʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: тёняхаˮнатиʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [тёняхататиʼ, тёняхаттиʼ]
     тёня+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: тёнˮманатиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: тёнядиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: тёнямдиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: тёняндиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: тёняхандиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: тёняханандиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: тёняхадандиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: тёнявнандиʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: тёняхаюдиʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: тёняхаюдиʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: тёняхаютиʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: тёндиʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: тёндиʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: тёнтиʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: тёняхатиʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: тёняхаˮнатиʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [тёняхататиʼ, тёняхаттиʼ]
     тёня+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: тёнˮманатиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: тёняваˮ
     тёня+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: тёняваˮ
     тёня+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: тёнянаˮ
     тёня+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: тёняханаˮ
     тёня+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: тёняхананаˮ
     тёня+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: [тёняхаданаˮ, тёняхаднаˮ]
     тёня+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: тёнявнанаˮ
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: тёняхаюнаˮ
     тёня+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: тёняхаюнаˮ
     тёня+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: тёняхаюнаˮ
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: тённаˮ
     тёня+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: тённаˮ
     тёня+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: тёнˮнаˮ
     тёня+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: тёняхаˮнаˮ
     тёня+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: тёняхаˮнанаˮ
     тёня+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: [тёняхатанаˮ, тёняхатнаˮ]
     тёня+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: тёнˮмананаˮ
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: тёняраˮ
     тёня+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: тёнямдаˮ
     тёня+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: тёняндаˮ
     тёня+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: тёняхандаˮ
     тёня+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: тёняханандаˮ
     тёня+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: тёняхадандаˮ
     тёня+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: тёнявнандаˮ
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: тёняхаюдаˮ
     тёня+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: тёняхаюдаˮ
     тёня+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: тёняхаютаˮ
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: тёндаˮ
     тёня+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: тёндаˮ
     тёня+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: тёнтаˮ
     тёня+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: тёняхатаˮ
     тёня+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: тёняхаˮнатаˮ
     тёня+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [тёняхататаˮ, тёняхаттаˮ]
     тёня+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: тёнˮманатаˮ
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: тёнядоʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: тёнямдоʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: тёняндоʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: тёняхандоʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: тёняханандоʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: тёняхадандоʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: тёнявнандоʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: тёняхаюдоʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: тёняхаюдоʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: тёняхаютоʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: тёндоʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: тёндоʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: тёнтоʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: тёняхатоʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: тёняхаˮнатоʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [тёняхататоʼ, тёняхаттоʼ]
     тёня+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: тёнˮманатоʼ
     тёня+N+Pred+Abs: тёняд
     тёня+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [тёнядав, тёнядув]
     тёня+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [тёнядав, тёнядув]
     тёня+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: тёнядан
     тёня+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: тёнядар
     тёня+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: тёнядамд
     тёня+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: тёняданд
     тёня+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: тёнядада
     тёня+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: тёнядамда
     тёня+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: тёняданда
     тёня+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: тёнядамиʼ
     тёня+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: тёнядами #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тёня+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: тёнядамиʼ
     тёня+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: тёнядами #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тёня+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: тёняданиʼ
     тёня+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: тёнядани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     тёня+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: тёнядариʼ
     тёня+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: тёнядамдиʼ
     тёня+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: тёнядандиʼ
     тёня+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: тёнядадиʼ
     тёня+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: тёнядамдиʼ
     тёня+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: тёнядандиʼ
     тёня+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: тёнядаваˮ
     тёня+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: тёнядаваˮ
     тёня+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: тёняданаˮ
     тёня+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: тёнядараˮ
     тёня+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: тёнядамдаˮ
     тёня+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: тёнядандаˮ
     тёня+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: тёнядадоʼ
     тёня+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: тёнядамдоʼ
     тёня+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: тёнядандоʼ
     тёня+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: тёнядмʼ
     тёня+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: тёнян
     тёня+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: тёня
     тёня+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: тёняниʼ
     тёня+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: тёнядиʼ
     тёня+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тёняхаʼ
     тёня+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: тёняваˮ
     тёня+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: тёнядаˮ
     тёня+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тёняˮ
     тёня+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: тёнядамзь
     тёня+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: тёнянась
     тёня+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: тёнясь
     тёня+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: тёнянинзь
     тёня+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: тёнядинзь
     тёня+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тёняханзь
     тёня+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: тёняваць
     тёня+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: тёнядаць
     тёня+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тёняць
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: тёняв
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: тёняр
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: тёняда
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: тёнямиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: тёняриʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: тёнядиʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: тёняваˮ
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: тёняраˮ
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: тёнядоʼ
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: тёнявась
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: тёнярась
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: тёнядась
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: тёняминзь
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: тёняринзь
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: тёнядинзь
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: тёняваць
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: тёняраць
     тёня+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: тёнядонзь
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тёняхаюн
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тёняхаюд
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тёняхаюда
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тёняхаюниʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тёняхаюдиʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тёняхаюдиʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тёняхаюнаˮ
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тёняхаюдаˮ
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тёняхаюдоʼ
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тёняхаюнась
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тёняхаюдась
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тёняхаюдась
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тёняхаюнинзь
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тёняхаюдинзь
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тёняхаюдинзь
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тёняхаюнаць
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тёняхаюдаць
     тёня+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тёняхаюдонзь
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тёнан
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тёнад
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тёнда
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тённиʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тёндиʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тёндиʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тённаˮ
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тёндаˮ
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тёндоʼ
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тённась
     тёня+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тёндась
